Hawaii statutes.
§435E-15 Funds, investment. All funds
held in trust which are in excess of current financial needs shall be invested
and reinvested from time to time, under the direction of the board of trustees,
in a manner consistent with the requirements of article 8 of chapter 412, or in
certificates of deposits or time deposits issued by banks, savings banks,
savings and loan associations and depository financial services loan companies
in Hawaii duly insured by instrumentalities of the United States government. [L
1977, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 350, §21]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next